District of Columbia statutes.
2-1209.06

Mayor may contract for outside management.

The Mayor may contract with a for-profit or a nonprofit corporation or educational institution that can utilize its resources to provide management of the business incubator facility and its services, to provide business development assistance, and to coordinate financial assistance programs. The selection of a contractor for this purpose shall be subject to review by the Council’s Committee on Economic Development.

Dec. 12, 1985, D.C. Law 6-71, § 7, 32 DCR 6334
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 126(a), 47 DCR 520
1981 Ed., § 1-2236.
D.C. Law 13-91 deleted the former second sentence, which read: “This contractor would implement the recommendations of the Advisory Board established in § 1-2241. 1981 Ed. ”, and in the second sentence, substituted “Economic Development” for “Housing and Economic Development (‘HED Committee’)”.